District of Columbia statutes.
22-3303

Grave robbery; buying or selling dead bodies.

Whoever, without legal authority or without the consent of the nearest surviving relative, shall disturb or remove any dead body from a grave for the purpose of dissecting, or of buying, selling, or in any way trafficking in the same, shall be imprisoned not less than 1 year nor more than 3 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1334, ch. 854, § 891
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(s), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Unlawful traffic in dead bodies, see § 3-206.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3103.
1973 Ed., § 22-3103.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(s) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.